Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.330

Interagency disputes—Alternative dispute resolution—Methods.

Whenever a dispute arises between state agencies, agencies shall employ every effort to resolve the dispute themselves without resorting to litigation. These efforts shall involve alternative dispute resolution methods. If a dispute cannot be resolved by the agencies involved, any one of the disputing agencies may request the governor to assist in the resolution of the dispute. The governor shall employ whatever dispute resolution methods that the governor deems appropriate in resolving the dispute. Such methods may include, but are not limited to, the appointment by the governor of a mediator, acceptable to the disputing agencies, to assist in the resolution of the dispute. The governor may also request assistance from the attorney general to advise the mediator and the disputing agencies.

[ 1993 c 279 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—1993 c 279: See note following RCW 43.17.320.